Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-2123.01
Redevelopment project with property outside corporate limits and extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction; formerly used defense site; agreement with county authorized.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Community Development Law to the contrary, a city may undertake a redevelopment project that includes real property located outside the corporate limits of such city and outside the city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction if the following requirements have been met:

(a) The real property located outside the corporate limits of the city and outside the city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction is a formerly used defense site;

(b) The formerly used defense site is located within the same county as the city approving such redevelopment project;

(c) The formerly used defense site is located within a sanitary and improvement district;

(d) The governing body of the city approving such redevelopment project passes an ordinance stating such city's intent to annex the formerly used defense site in the future; and

(e) The redevelopment project has been consented to by any city exercising extraterritorial jurisdiction over the formerly used defense site.

(2) For purposes of this section, formerly used defense site means real property that was formerly owned by, leased to, or otherwise possessed by the United States and under the jurisdiction of the United States Secretary of Defense. Formerly used defense site does not include missile silos.

(3) The inclusion of a formerly used defense site in any redevelopment project under this section shall not result in:

(a) Any change in the service area of any electric utility or natural gas utility unless such change has been agreed to by the electric utility or natural gas utility serving the formerly used defense site at the time of approval of such redevelopment project; or

(b) Any change in the service area of any communications company as defined in section 77-2734.04 unless (i) such change has been agreed to by the communications company serving the formerly used defense site at the time of approval of such redevelopment project or (ii) such change occurs pursuant to sections 86-135 to 86-138.

(4) A city approving a redevelopment project under this section and the county in which the formerly used defense site is located may enter into an agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act in which the county agrees to reimburse such city for any services the city provides to the formerly used defense site after approval of the redevelopment project.

Laws 2013, LB66, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 80.
July 18, 2026
Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.